Hawaii statutes.
§142-28.5 Animal quarantine special fund.
There is established the animal quarantine special fund to be administered by
the board of agriculture. Moneys received by the board of agriculture from:

(1) Fees for the quarantine of cats, dogs, and other
carnivores pursuant to this chapter;

(2) Moneys received for the use of animal quarantine
property or facilities pursuant to section 142-3.5; or

(3) State appropriations or other moneys made
available,

shall be deposited into the special fund. All
interest earned or accrued on moneys deposited in the special fund shall become
part of the special fund. Moneys in the special fund shall be expended to
cover all costs of quarantine but not limited to the costs of salaries, fringe
benefits, operating expenses, including the defraying of quarantine fees,
equipment, motor vehicles, contract with any qualified person or entity for
animal care services, operation and maintenance of the quarantine station, and
promotional expenses. A reserve shall be appropriated and maintained in the
special fund to cover contingency costs, including but not limited to accrued
vacation leave, unemployment insurance, and workers' compensation. [L 1998, c
210, §1; am L 2000, c 278, §2; am L 2005, c 161, §3; am L 2011, c 185, §3]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next